Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-608
Attorney General; enforcement duties; civil penalty.

(1) For purposes of enforcing the Invention Development Services Disclosure Act, the Attorney General may conduct investigations, hold hearings, and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of accounts, books, and documents by the issuance of subpoenas.

(2) The Attorney General shall enforce the act and may recover a civil penalty not to exceed three thousand dollars for each violation of the act and seek equitable relief to restrain any violation.

Laws 1991, LB 96, § 8.